Louisiana, session 2026, HB341.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:2531(A) and (B) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§2531. Applicability; minimum standards during investigation; penalties for failure
to comply
A.(1) The provisions of this Chapter shall apply only to police employees as
defined by R.S. 40:1372(5), Louisiana P.O.S.T. certified probation and parole
officers employed by the Louisiana Department of Public Safety and Corrections,
division of probation and parole, and to those law enforcement officers employed by
any municipality and campus police employed at any state-supported college or
university who are under investigation with a view to possible disciplinary action,
demotion, or dismissal.
(2) Unless context otherwise requires, the following terms when used in this
Section have the following meanings:
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-630 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 341
(a) "Interrogation" includes but is not limited to any formal administrative
interview, inquiry, or questioning of any police employee by the appointing authority
or the appointing authority's designee regarding misconduct, allegations of
misconduct, or policy violations. An initial inquiry conducted by the police
employee's immediate supervisors shall not be considered an interrogation.
B. Whenever a police employee or law enforcement officer is under
investigation, the following minimum standards shall apply:
(1) Prior to commencing a formal administrative investigation of a police
employee or law enforcement officer, the appointing authority shall notify the
employee in writing of the nature of the investigation, of the identity and authority
of the person conducting such investigation, and of the specific charges or violations
being investigated.
(1)(2) The police employee or law enforcement officer being investigated
shall be informed, at the commencement of interrogation, of the nature of the
investigation and the identity and authority of the person conducting such
investigation, and at the commencement of any interrogation, such officer shall be
informed as to the identity of all persons present during such interrogation. The
police employee or law enforcement officer shall be allowed to make notes.
(2)(3) Any interrogation of a police employee or law enforcement officer in
connection with an investigation shall be for a reasonable period of time and shall
allow for reasonable periods for the rest and personal necessities of such police
employee or law enforcement officer.
(3)(4) All interrogations of any police employee or law enforcement officer
in connection with the investigation shall be recorded in full. The police employee
or law enforcement officer shall not be prohibited from obtaining a copy of the
recording or transcript of the recording of his statements upon his written request.
(4)(a)(5)(a) The police employee or law enforcement officer being
questioned, whether as a target or as a witness in an administrative investigation,
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-630 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 341
shall have the right to may be represented by counsel, other representative, or both,
of the police employee or law enforcement officer's choice.
(b)(i) Except as otherwise provided in this Subparagraph, the police
employee or law enforcement officer shall be granted up to fourteen days to secure
such representation, during which time all questioning shall be suspended.
(ii) If a police employee or law enforcement officer is involved in an officer-
involved incident, the police employee or law enforcement officer shall be granted
up to fourteen days to secure representation, during which time all questioning shall
be suspended. However, if the police employee or law enforcement officer is
confined to a medical facility due to injury or illness related to the officer-involved
incident, or otherwise incapacitated, the police employee or law enforcement officer
shall be granted up to thirty days to secure representation.
(iii) For purposes of this Subparagraph, "officer-involved incident" means

any incident in which serious bodily injury or death of another individual is caused
by any intentional or accidental use of a dangerous or deadly weapon by a police
employee or law enforcement officer which results from the efforts of a police
employee or law enforcement officer attempting to effectively arrest or otherwise
gain control of another or while in police custody.
(iv) For purposes of this Subparagraph, "serious bodily injury" means bodily
injury which involves unconsciousness, extreme physical pain, protracted or obvious
disfigurement, protracted loss or impairment of a bodily member, organ, or mental
faculty, or a substantial risk of death.
(c) The police employee or law enforcement officer's representative or
counsel shall be allowed to offer advice to the employee or officer and make
statements on the record regarding any question asked of the employee or officer at
any interrogation, interview, or hearing in the course of the investigation.
(5)(6) No statement made by the police employee or law enforcement officer
during the course of an administrative investigation shall be is admissible in a
criminal proceeding.
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-630 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 341
(7) When a formal, written complaint is made against any police employee
or law enforcement officer, the superintendent of state police or the chief of police
or his authorized representative shall initiate an investigation within fourteen days
of the date the complaint is made. Except as otherwise provided in this Paragraph,
each investigation of a police employee or law enforcement officer which is
conducted under pursuant to the provisions of this Chapter shall be completed within
seventy-five days, inclusive of Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays. However,
in each municipality which is subject to a Municipal Fire and Police Civil Service
law, the municipal police department may petition the Municipal Fire and Police
Civil Service Board for an extension of the time within which to complete the
investigation. The board shall set the matter for hearing and shall provide notice of
the hearing to the police employee or law enforcement officer who is under
investigation. The police employee or law enforcement officer who is under
investigation shall have the right to may attend the hearing and to present evidence
and arguments against the extension. If the board finds that the municipal police
department has shown good cause for the granting of an extension of time within
which to complete the investigation, the board shall grant an extension of up to sixty
days. Nothing contained in this Paragraph shall be construed to prohibit the police
employee or law enforcement officer under investigation and the appointing
authority from entering into a written agreement extending the investigation for up
to an additional sixty days. The investigation shall be considered complete upon
notice to the police employee or law enforcement officer under investigation of a
pre-disciplinary predisciplinary hearing or a determination of an unfounded or
unsustained complaint. The notice may be given in writing or electronically. The
notice is considered received by the police employee or law enforcement officer
under investigation on the date sent, provided it is sent to the department email
address in the personnel file of the police employee or law enforcement officer. The
notice shall be considered received by the police employee or law enforcement
officer under investigation on the date received, provided it is sent to the home
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-630 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 341
address in the personnel file of the police employee or the law enforcement officer.
Nothing in this Paragraph shall limit any investigation of alleged criminal activity.
(8) In the case of a police employee who is a member of the State Police
Service as set forth in Article X, Section 41 of the Louisiana Constitution of 1974,
the appointing authority may petition the State Police Commission, or its executive
director, for an extension of the time within which to complete the investigation.
The State Police Commission, or its executive director, shall set the matter for
hearing and shall provide notice of the hearing to the police employee who is under
investigation. The police employee who is under investigation shall have the right
to may attend the hearing and to present evidence and arguments against the
extension. If the State Police Commission, or its executive director, finds that the
appointing authority has shown good cause for the granting of an extension of time
within which to complete the investigation, the State Police Commission, or its
executive director, shall grant an extension of up to sixty days. Nothing contained
in this Paragraph shall be construed to prohibit the police employee under
investigation and the appointing authority from entering into a written agreement
extending the investigation for up to an additional sixty days. The investigation shall
be considered complete upon determination of the appointing authority to institute
disciplinary action against the police employee or a determination of an unfounded
or unsustained complaint. Nothing in this Paragraph shall limit any investigation of
alleged criminal activity.
* * *